Utah statutes.
57-8-47.   Provisions applicable to nonjudicial foreclosure.

(1)  An association of unit owners' nonjudicial foreclosure of a unit is governed by:

(a)  Sections 57-1-19 through 57-1-34, to the same extent as though the association of unit owners' lien were a trust deed; and

(b)  this chapter.

(2)  If there is a conflict between a provision of this chapter and a provision of Sections 57-1-19 through 57-1-34 with respect to an association of unit owners' nonjudicial foreclosure of a unit, the provision of this chapter controls.



Enacted by Chapter 355, 2011 General Session

